Hawaii, session 2025, HB1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that access to high-quality health care that is accessible, affordable, and equitable is of paramount importance to public health and wellness.  However, the legislature also finds that approximately five hundred pregnant persons in the State are denied access to affordable health care through medicaid, the children's health insurance program, and health insurance exchanges established under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, because of their immigration status.  Evidence-based studies show that low-income immigrants without access to prenatal care are seven times more likely to give birth prematurely and five times more likely to experience neonatal death, which demonstrates that limited access to health care for pregnant persons and their newborn children significantly increases the risk of exposure to life-threatening situations. The legislature further finds that as of May 2024, twenty-four states plus the District of Columbia provide medicaid coverage to all income-qualified pregnant residents regardless of their immigrant status.  In Hawaii, the daily-average cost of a neonatal intensive care unit stay is between $7,000 and $8,000.  The department of human services estimates the cost of providing income-qualified pregnant persons with health insurance coverage and twelve months of postpartum care at $1,364,000 annually.  Increasing access to health insurance coverage to include income-qualified pregnant persons will reduce barriers and increase access to health care for resident immigrant populations in the State. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of human services to authorize medicaid coverage through the children's health insurance program to income-qualified pregnant persons and children regardless of immigration status. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to provide medicaid coverage through the children's health insurance program for income-qualified pregnant persons who are otherwise ineligible due to their immigration status. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to provide medicaid coverage through the children's health insurance program for income-qualified children who are otherwise ineligible due to their immigration status. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________